Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-802
Issuance; terms; election; notice; vote.

If the people of any county in the State of Nebraska, or a considerable number thereof, shall be in destitute, dependent, or needy circumstances on account of any cyclone, tornado or destructive windstorm, the county board of such county may call an election, and said board and the county clerk of such county shall give notice of such election by publication in two consecutive issues of one or more newspapers published and of general circulation in such county, and by posting a notice at the polling places in each election precinct therein. If a majority of the votes cast at such election shall be in favor of issuing said bonds, the county board shall issue the bonds of the county payable in not more than ten years, with interest payable semiannually. The county shall reserve to itself the privilege of paying off all or any part of said bonds, at any time on or after five years, by inserting a provision to that effect in the proposition submitting said bonds, and in the bonds when issued.

Laws 1913, c. 229, § 2, p. 663;

R.S.1913, § 472;

C.S.1922, § 389;

C.S.1929, § 11-1002;

R.S.1943, § 10-802;

Laws 1947, c. 15, § 7, p. 86;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 16, p. 282.